California, session 20252026, AB1582.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 3571.01 is added to the Government Code, to read:3571.01. (a) With respect to arbitrations over violations of a collective bargaining agreement that relate to the contracting out of bargaining unit work, it shall be an unfair practice for a higher education employer to do any of the following:(1) Fail or refuse to schedule an arbitration within a reasonable period of time after the union has appealed the matter to arbitration, unless the exclusive representative has placed the grievance in abeyance or the parties have agreed to do so. (2) Fail or refuse to implement an arbitration award and remedy in full within 60 days of a decision on the merits. (3) (A) Circumvent or disregard an arbitrator’s decision by extending or renewing an existing contract, contract or entering into one or more new contracts for the same or similar services, services at the same location, or otherwise violating the same contract term or terms already interpreted by an arbitrator to prohibit the employer’s conduct. (B) In the cases described in subparagraph (A), the board shall not defer repeat offenses to subsequent arbitration proceedings.(4) (A) Fail or refuse to remedy, in whole or in part, an arbitrator’s decision that remands the remedy to be determined by the parties. (B) In the cases described in subparagraph (A), the board shall defer to the merits of the arbitration award but shall not defer disputes regarding the remedy to subsequent arbitration proceedings absent agreement of the parties.(b) Remedies for a violation of this section shall include the charging party’s attorney’s fees and costs. (c) Except as expressly set forth in this section, this section does not limit the board’s broad remedial authority.